nl: Afwerking fust: Bourbonvat; Cognacvat; Madeiravat; Nieuw eikenhout; Portvat; Rumvat; Sherryvat; Tequilavat; Wijnvat; Overige
pt-BR: Acabamento do barril: Barril de bourbon; Barril de conhaque; Barril de vinho da Madeira; Carvalho novo; Barril de vinho do Porto; Barril de rum; Barril de xerez; Barril de tequila; Barril de vinho; Outro
ro-RO: Finisare în butoi: Butoi de bourbon; Butoi de coniac; Butoi de Madeira; Stejar nou; Butoi de vin de Porto; Butoi de rom; Butoi de sherry; Butoi de tequila; Butoi de vin; Altele
vi: Lớp ủ hoàn thiện trong thùng gỗ sồi: Thùng ủ Bourbon; Thùng ủ Cognac; Thùng ủ Madeira; Gỗ sồi mới; Thùng ủ vang Port; Thùng ủ Rum; Thùng ủ Sherry; Thùng ủ Tequila; Thùng ủ rượu vang; Khác
bg-BG: Бъчва за довършване: Бъчва от бърбън; Бъчва от коняк; Бъчва от мадейра; Нов дъб; Бъчва от порто; Бъчва от ром; Бъчва от шери; Бъчва от текила; Бъчва от вино; Друго
nb: Overflatebehandling på tønne: Bourbon-fat; Cognac-fat; Madeira-fat; Ny eik; Portvinsfat; Rom-fat; Sherry-fat; Tequila-fat; Vinfat; Annet
da: Tøndefinish: Bourbon-fad; Cognac-fad; Madeira-fad; Ny eg; Portvinsfad; Rom-fad; Sherry-fad; Tequila-fad; Vinfad; Andet
es: Acabado del tonel: Barrica de bourbon; Barrica de coñac; Barrica de Madeira; Roble nuevo; Barrica de oporto; Barrica de ron; Barrica de jerez; Barrica de tequila; Barrica de vino; Otro
zh-CN: 桶陈风格: 波本桶; 干邑桶; 马德拉桶; 新橡木桶; 波特桶; 朗姆桶; 雪莉桶; 龙舌兰桶; 葡萄酒桶; 其他
el: Φινίρισμα βαρελιού: Βαρέλι bourbon; Βαρέλι κονιάκ; Βαρέλι Madeira; Νέο δρύινο; Βαρέλι Port; Βαρέλι ρούμι; Βαρέλι σέρι; Βαρέλι τεκίλας; Βαρέλι κρασιού; Άλλο
fr: Finition en fût: Fût de bourbon; Fût de cognac; Fût de madère; Chêne neuf; Fût de porto; Fût de rhum; Fût de xérès; Fût de tequila; Fût de vin; Autre
pt-PT: Acabamento do casco: Barril de bourbon; Barril de conhaque; Barril de vinho da Madeira; Carvalho novo; Barril de vinho do Porto; Barril de rum; Barril de xerez; Barril de tequila; Barril de vinho; Outro
de: Fassveredelung: Bourbon-Fass; Cognac-Fass; Madeira-Fass; Neue Eiche; Portwein-Fass; Rum-Fass; Sherry-Fass; Tequila-Fass; Wein-Fass; Sonstige
ko: 캐스크 마감: 버번 배럴; 꼬냑 캐스크; 마데이라 캐스크; 새 오크; 포트 캐스크; 럼 캐스크; 셰리 캐스크; 데킬라 캐스크; 와인 캐스크; 기타
fi: Viimeistelyyn käytetty tynnyri: Bourbon-tynnyri; Konjakkitynnyri; Madeira-tynnyri; Uusi tammi; Portviinitynnyri; Rommitynnyri; Sherrytynnyri; Tequilatynnyri; Viinitynnyri; Muu
sv: Fatyta: Bourbonfat; Konjaksfat; Madeirafat; Ny ek; Portvinsfat; Romfat; Sherryfat; Tequilafat; Vinfat; Annat
cs: Zrání v sudech: Sud po bourbonu; Sud po koňaku; Sud po madeiře; Nový dubový sud; Sud po portském; Sud po rumu; Sud po sherry; Sud po tequile; Sud po vínu; Jiné
pl: Wykończenie beczki: Beczka po bourbonie; Beczka po koniaku; Beczka po maderze; Nowy dąb; Beczka po porto; Beczka po rumie; Beczka po sherry; Beczka po tequili; Beczka po winie; Inne
th: การบ่มในถังไม้โอ๊ค: ถังเบอร์เบิน; ถังคอนยัค; ถังมาเดรา; ถังไม้โอ๊กใหม่; ถังพอร์ต; ถังรัม; ถังเชอร์รี; ถังเตกีลา; ถังไวน์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava suda: Sud po bourbone; Sud po koňaku; Sud po víne Madeira; Nový dubový sud; Sud po portskom víne; Sud po rume; Sud po sherry; Sud po tequile; Sud po víne; Iný
lt-LT: Bačkos apdaila: Burbono statinės; Konjako statinės; Maderos statinės; Naujo ąžuolo; Portveino statinės; Romo statinės; Chereso statinės; Tekilos statinės; Vyno statinės; Kita
hr-HR: Izgled bačve: Bačva za burbon; Bačva za konjak; Bačva za Madeiru; Novi hrast; Bačva za porto; Bačva za rum; Bačva za sherry; Bačva za tekilu; Bačva za vino; Ostalo
ru: Отделка бочки: Бочка из-под бурбона; Бочка из-под коньяка; Бочка из-под мадеры; Новый дуб; Бочка из-под портвейна; Бочка из-под рома; Бочка из-под хереса; Бочка из-под текилы; Бочка из-под вина; Другое
zh-TW: 桶陳表面處理: 波本桶; 干邑桶; 馬德拉桶; 新橡木桶; 波特桶; 蘭姆桶; 雪莉桶; 龍舌蘭桶; 葡萄酒桶; 其他
tr: Sonlandırma fıçısı: Burbon fıçısı; Konyak fıçısı; Madeira fıçısı; Yeni meşe; Porto fıçısı; Rom fıçısı; Şeri fıçısı; Tekila fıçısı; Şarap fıçısı; Diğer
en: Cask finish: Bourbon barrel; Cognac cask; Madeira cask; New oak; Port cask; Rum cask; Sherry cask; Tequila cask; Wine cask; Other
sl-SI: Zaključna obdelava soda: Sod za burbon; Sod za konjak; Sod za madeiro; Nov hrast; Sod za portovec; Sod za rum; Sod za šeri; Sod za tekilo; Sod za vino; Drugo
hu: Hordós utóérlelés: Bourbonhordó; Konyakhordó; Madeirahordó; Új tölgyfa; Portóihordó; Rumhordó; Sherryhordó; Tequilahordó; Boroshordó; Egyéb
it: Finitura della botte: Botte di bourbon; Botte di cognac; Botte di Madeira; Rovere nuovo; Botte di porto; Botte di rum; Botte di sherry; Botte di tequila; Botte di vino; Altro
ja: 樽仕上げ: バーボン樽; コニャック樽; マデイラ樽; 新オーク樽; ポート樽; ラム樽; シェリー樽; テキーラ樽; ワイン樽; その他